Missouri, session 2026, SB1450.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 105.711, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 105.711,
3 to read as follows:
1 105.711. 1. There is hereby created a "State Legal
2 Expense Fund" which shall consist of moneys appropriated to
3 the fund by the general assembly and moneys otherwise
4 credited to such fund pursuant to section 105.716.
5 2. Moneys in the state legal expense fund shall be
6 available for the payment of any claim or any amount
7 required by any final judgment rendered by a court of
8 competent jurisdiction against:
9 (1) The state of Missouri, or any agency of the state,
10 pursuant to section 536.050 or 536.087 or section 537.600;
11 (2) Any officer or employee of the state of Missouri
12 or any agency of the state, including, without limitation,
13 elected officials, appointees, members of state boards or
14 commissions, and members of the Missouri National Guard upon
15 conduct of such officer or employee arising out of and
16 performed in connection with his or her official duties on
17 behalf of the state, or any agency of the state, provided
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1450 2
18 that moneys in this fund shall not be available for payment
19 of claims made under chapter 287;
20 (3) (a) Any physician, psychiatrist, pharmacist,
21 podiatrist, dentist, nurse, or other health care provider
22 licensed to practice in Missouri under the provisions of
23 chapter 330, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337 or 338 who is employed
24 by the state of Missouri or any agency of the state under
25 formal contract to conduct disability reviews on behalf of
26 the department of elementary and secondary education or
27 provide services to patients or inmates of state
28 correctional facilities on a part-time basis, and any
29 physician, psychiatrist, pharmacist, podiatrist, dentist,
30 nurse, or other health care provider licensed to practice in
31 Missouri under the provisions of chapter 330, 332, 334, 335,
32 336, 337, or 338 who is under formal contract to provide
33 services to patients or inmates at a county jail on a part-
34 time basis;
35 (b) Any physician licensed to practice medicine in
36 Missouri under the provisions of chapter 334 and his
37 professional corporation organized pursuant to chapter 356
38 who is employed by or under contract with a city or county
39 health department organized under chapter 192 or chapter
40 205, or a city health department operating under a city
41 charter, or a combined city-county health department to
42 provide services to patients for medical care caused by
43 pregnancy, delivery, and child care, if such medical
44 services are provided by the physician pursuant to the
45 contract without compensation or the physician is paid from
46 no other source than a governmental agency except for
47 patient co-payments required by federal or state law or
48 local ordinance;

SB 1450 3
49 (c) Any physician licensed to practice medicine in
50 Missouri under the provisions of chapter 334 who is employed
51 by or under contract with a federally funded community
52 health center organized under Section 315, 329, 330 or 340
53 of the Public Health Services Act (42 U.S.C. Section 216,
54 254c) to provide services to patients for medical care
55 caused by pregnancy, delivery, and child care, if such
56 medical services are provided by the physician pursuant to
57 the contract or employment agreement without compensation or
58 the physician is paid from no other source than a
59 governmental agency or such a federally funded community
60 health center except for patient co-payments required by
61 federal or state law or local ordinance. In the case of any
62 claim or judgment that arises under this paragraph, the
63 aggregate of payments from the state legal expense fund
64 shall be limited to a maximum of one million dollars for all
65 claims arising out of and judgments based upon the same act
66 or acts alleged in a single cause against any such
67 physician, and shall not exceed one million dollars for any
68 one claimant;
69 (d) Any physician licensed pursuant to chapter 334 who
70 is affiliated with and receives no compensation from a
71 nonprofit entity qualified as exempt from federal taxation
72 under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
73 1986, as amended, which offers a free health screening in
74 any setting or any physician, nurse, physician assistant,
75 dental hygienist, dentist, or other health care professional
76 licensed or registered under chapter 330, 331, 332, 334,
77 335, 336, 337, or 338 who provides health care services
78 within the scope of his or her license or registration at a
79 city or county health department organized under chapter 192
80 or chapter 205, a city health department operating under a

SB 1450 4
81 city charter, or a combined city-county health department,
82 or a nonprofit community health center qualified as exempt
83 from federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the
84 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, excluding
85 federally funded community health centers as specified in
86 paragraph (c) of this subdivision and rural health clinics
87 under 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(1), if such services are
88 restricted to primary care and preventive health services,
89 provided that such services shall not include the
90 performance of an abortion, and if such health services are
91 provided by the health care professional licensed or
92 registered under chapter 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337,
93 or 338 without compensation. MO HealthNet or Medicare
94 payments for primary care and preventive health services
95 provided by a health care professional licensed or
96 registered under chapter 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337,
97 or 338 who volunteers at a community health clinic is not
98 compensation for the purpose of this section if the total
99 payment is assigned to the community health clinic. For the
100 purposes of the section, "community health clinic" means a
101 nonprofit community health center qualified as exempt from
102 federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
103 Revenue Code of 1987, as amended, that provides primary care
104 and preventive health services to people without health
105 insurance coverage. In the case of any claim or judgment
106 that arises under this paragraph, the aggregate of payments
107 from the state legal expense fund shall be limited to a
108 maximum of five hundred thousand dollars, for all claims
109 arising out of and judgments based upon the same act or acts
110 alleged in a single cause and shall not exceed five hundred
111 thousand dollars for any one claimant, and insurance
112 policies purchased pursuant to the provisions of section

SB 1450 5
113 105.721 shall be limited to five hundred thousand dollars.
114 Liability or malpractice insurance obtained and maintained
115 in force by or on behalf of any health care professional
116 licensed or registered under chapter 330, 331, 332, 334,
117 335, 336, 337, or 338 shall not be considered available to
118 pay that portion of a judgment or claim for which the state
119 legal expense fund is liable under this paragraph;
120 (e) Any physician, nurse, physician assistant, dental
121 hygienist, or dentist licensed or registered to practice
122 medicine, nursing, or dentistry or to act as a physician
123 assistant or dental hygienist in Missouri under the
124 provisions of chapter 332, 334, or 335, or lawfully
125 practicing, who provides medical, nursing, or dental
126 treatment within the scope of his license or registration to
127 students of a school whether a public, private, or parochial
128 elementary or secondary school or summer camp, if such
129 physician's treatment is restricted to primary care and
130 preventive health services and if such medical, dental, or
131 nursing services are provided by the physician, dentist,
132 physician assistant, dental hygienist, or nurse without
133 compensation. In the case of any claim or judgment that
134 arises under this paragraph, the aggregate of payments from
135 the state legal expense fund shall be limited to a maximum
136 of five hundred thousand dollars, for all claims arising out
137 of and judgments based upon the same act or acts alleged in
138 a single cause and shall not exceed five hundred thousand
139 dollars for any one claimant, and insurance policies
140 purchased pursuant to the provisions of section 105.721
141 shall be limited to five hundred thousand dollars; or
142 (f) Any physician licensed under chapter 334, or
143 dentist licensed under chapter 332, providing medical care
144 without compensation to an individual referred to his or her

SB 1450 6
145 care by a city or county health department organized under
146 chapter 192 or 205, a city health department operating under
147 a city charter, or a combined city-county health department,
148 or nonprofit health center qualified as exempt from federal
149 taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
150 Code of 1986, as amended, or a federally funded community
151 health center organized under Section 315, 329, 330, or 340
152 of the Public Health Services Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 216,
153 254c; provided that such treatment shall not include the
154 performance of an abortion. In the case of any claim or
155 judgment that arises under this paragraph, the aggregate of
156 payments from the state legal expense fund shall be limited
157 to a maximum of one million dollars for all claims arising
158 out of and judgments based upon the same act or acts alleged
159 in a single cause and shall not exceed one million dollars
160 for any one claimant, and insurance policies purchased under
161 the provisions of section 105.721 shall be limited to one
162 million dollars. Liability or malpractice insurance
163 obtained and maintained in force by or on behalf of any
164 physician licensed under chapter 334, or any dentist
165 licensed under chapter 332, shall not be considered
166 available to pay that portion of a judgment or claim for
167 which the state legal expense fund is liable under this
168 paragraph;
169 (4) Staff employed by the juvenile division of any
170 judicial circuit;
171 (5) Any attorney licensed to practice law in the state
172 of Missouri who practices law at or through a nonprofit
173 community social services center qualified as exempt from
174 federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
175 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or through any agency of
176 any federal, state, or local government, if such legal

SB 1450 7
177 practice is provided by the attorney without compensation.
178 In the case of any claim or judgment that arises under this
179 subdivision, the aggregate of payments from the state legal
180 expense fund shall be limited to a maximum of five hundred
181 thousand dollars for all claims arising out of and judgments
182 based upon the same act or acts alleged in a single cause
183 and shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars for any
184 one claimant, and insurance policies purchased pursuant to
185 the provisions of section 105.721 shall be limited to five
186 hundred thousand dollars;
187 (6) Any social welfare board created under section
188 205.770 and the members and officers thereof upon conduct of
189 such officer or employee while acting in his or her capacity
190 as a board member or officer, and any physician, nurse,
191 physician assistant, dental hygienist, dentist, or other
192 health care professional licensed or registered under
193 chapter 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337, or 338 who is
194 referred to provide medical care without compensation by the
195 board and who provides health care services within the scope
196 of his or her license or registration as prescribed by the
197 board; [or]
198 (7) Any person who is selected or appointed by the
199 state director of revenue under subsection 2 of section
200 136.055 to act as an agent of the department of revenue, to
201 the extent that such agent's actions or inactions upon which
202 such claim or judgment is based were performed in the course
203 of the person's official duties as an agent of the
204 department of revenue and in the manner required by state
205 law or department of revenue rules; or
206 (8) Any entity, including its members, officers, or
207 employees, that provides, under a contract or subcontract,
208 foster care case management services or residential services

SB 1450 8
209 pursuant to chapter 210, including, but not limited to,
210 services provided in section 210.112 or 210.119.
211 3. The department of health and senior services shall
212 promulgate rules regarding contract procedures and the
213 documentation of care provided under paragraphs (b), (c),
214 (d), (e), and (f) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
215 section. The limitation on payments from the state legal
216 expense fund or any policy of insurance procured pursuant to
217 the provisions of section 105.721, provided in subsection 7
218 of this section, shall not apply to any claim or judgment
219 arising under paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of
220 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section. Any claim
221 or judgment arising under paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
222 or (f) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section
223 shall be paid by the state legal expense fund or any policy
224 of insurance procured pursuant to section 105.721, to the
225 extent damages are allowed under sections 538.205 to
226 538.235. Liability or malpractice insurance obtained and
227 maintained in force by any health care professional licensed
228 or registered under chapter 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336,
229 337, or 338 for coverage concerning his or her private
230 practice and assets shall not be considered available under
231 subsection 7 of this section to pay that portion of a
232 judgment or claim for which the state legal expense fund is
233 liable under paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of
234 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section. However, a
235 health care professional licensed or registered under
236 chapter 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337, or 338 may
237 purchase liability or malpractice insurance for coverage of
238 liability claims or judgments based upon care rendered under
239 paragraphs (c), (d), (e), and (f) of subdivision (3) of
240 subsection 2 of this section which exceed the amount of

SB 1450 9
241 liability coverage provided by the state legal expense fund
242 under those paragraphs. Even if paragraph (a), (b), (c),
243 (d), (e), or (f) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
244 section is repealed or modified, the state legal expense
245 fund shall be available for damages which occur while the
246 pertinent paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of
247 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section is in effect.
248 4. The attorney general shall promulgate rules
249 regarding contract procedures and the documentation of legal
250 practice provided under subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of
251 this section. The limitation on payments from the state
252 legal expense fund or any policy of insurance procured
253 pursuant to section 105.721 as provided in subsection 7 of
254 this section shall not apply to any claim or judgment
255 arising under subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this
256 section. Any claim or judgment arising under subdivision
257 (5) of subsection 2 of this section shall be paid by the
258 state legal expense fund or any policy of insurance procured
259 pursuant to section 105.721 to the extent damages are
260 allowed under sections 538.205 to 538.235. Liability or
261 malpractice insurance otherwise obtained and maintained in
262 force shall not be considered available under subsection 7
263 of this section to pay that portion of a judgment or claim
264 for which the state legal expense fund is liable under
265 subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this section. However,
266 an attorney may obtain liability or malpractice insurance
267 for coverage of liability claims or judgments based upon
268 legal practice rendered under subdivision (5) of subsection
269 2 of this section that exceed the amount of liability
270 coverage provided by the state legal expense fund under
271 subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this section. Even if
272 subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this section is repealed

SB 1450 10
273 or amended, the state legal expense fund shall be available
274 for damages that occur while the pertinent subdivision (5)
275 of subsection 2 of this section is in effect.
276 5. All payments shall be made from the state legal
277 expense fund by the commissioner of administration with the
278 approval of the attorney general. Payment from the state
279 legal expense fund of a claim or final judgment award
280 against a health care professional licensed or registered
281 under chapter 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336, 337, or 338,
282 described in paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of
283 subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, or against
284 an attorney in subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this
285 section, shall only be made for services rendered in
286 accordance with the conditions of such paragraphs. In the
287 case of any claim or judgment against an officer or employee
288 of the state or any agency of the state based upon conduct
289 of such officer or employee arising out of and performed in
290 connection with his or her official duties on behalf of the
291 state or any agency of the state that would give rise to a
292 cause of action under section 537.600, the state legal
293 expense fund shall be liable, excluding punitive damages,
294 for:
295 (1) Economic damages to any one claimant; and
296 (2) Up to three hundred fifty thousand dollars for
297 noneconomic damages.
298 The state legal expense fund shall be the exclusive remedy
299 and shall preclude any other civil actions or proceedings
300 for money damages arising out of or relating to the same
301 subject matter against the state officer or employee, or the
302 officer's or employee's estate. No officer or employee of
303 the state or any agency of the state shall be individually

SB 1450 11
304 liable in his or her personal capacity for conduct of such
305 officer or employee arising out of and performed in
306 connection with his or her official duties on behalf of the
307 state or any agency of the state. The provisions of this
308 subsection shall not apply to any defendant who is not an
309 officer or employee of the state or any agency of the state
310 in any proceeding against an officer or employee of the
311 state or any agency of the state. Nothing in this
312 subsection shall limit the rights and remedies otherwise
313 available to a claimant under state law or common law in
314 proceedings where one or more defendants is not an officer
315 or employee of the state or any agency of the state.
316 6. The limitation on awards for noneconomic damages
317 provided for in this subsection shall be increased or
318 decreased on an annual basis effective January first of each
319 year in accordance with the Implicit Price Deflator for
320 Personal Consumption Expenditures as published by the Bureau
321 of Economic Analysis of the United States Department of
322 Commerce. The current value of the limitation shall be
323 calculated by the director of the department of commerce and
324 insurance, who shall furnish that value to the secretary of
325 state, who shall publish such value in the Missouri Register
326 as soon after each January first as practicable, but it
327 shall otherwise be exempt from the provisions of section
328 536.021.
329 7. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
330 in the case of any claim or judgment that arises under
331 sections 537.600 and 537.610 against the state of Missouri,
332 or an agency of the state, the aggregate of payments from
333 the state legal expense fund and from any policy of
334 insurance procured pursuant to the provisions of section
335 105.721 shall not exceed the limits of liability as provided

SB 1450 12
336 in sections 537.600 to 537.610. No payment shall be made
337 from the state legal expense fund or any policy of insurance
338 procured with state funds pursuant to section 105.721 unless
339 and until the benefits provided to pay the claim by any
340 other policy of liability insurance have been exhausted.
341 8. The provisions of section 33.080 notwithstanding,
342 any moneys remaining to the credit of the state legal
343 expense fund at the end of an appropriation period shall not
344 be transferred to general revenue.
345 9. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
346 defined in section 536.010, that is promulgated under the
347 authority delegated in sections 105.711 to 105.726 shall
348 become effective only if it has been promulgated pursuant to
349 the provisions of chapter 536. Nothing in this section
350 shall be interpreted to repeal or affect the validity of any
351 rule filed or adopted prior to August 28, 1999, if it fully
352 complied with the provisions of chapter 536. This section
353 and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
354 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
355 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and
356 annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
357 the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
358 adopted after August 28, 1999, shall be invalid and void.
✓